Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1710
Instruments for time-share use; contents.

Project instruments and time-share instruments creating time-share uses shall contain the following:

(1) Identification by name of the time-share project and street address where the time-share project is situated;

(2) Identification of the time periods, type of units, and the units that are in the time-share program and the length of time that the units are committed to the time-share program;

(3) In case of a time-share project, identification of which units are in the time-share program and the method whereby any other units may be added, deleted, or substituted; and

(4) Any other matters that the developer deems appropriate.

Laws 1980, LB 945, § 10.